Maryland, session 2025, HB1012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
6–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Massage Therapy Examiners.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1012*

HOUSE BILL 1012
(d) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued by the
Board to practice massage therapy.
(e) “Licensed massage therapist” means an individual who is licensed by the
Board to practice massage therapy.
(i) “Supervised hands–on techniques” means massage techniques that are
performed under the direct, in–person supervision of a qualified licensed instructor who is
on–site in:
(1) A classroom;
(2) A laboratory;
(3) A school clinic; or
(4) A health care setting.
6–305.1.
(A) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD, THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH CONTINUING
EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS AS A CONDITION OF THE RENEWAL OF A LICENSE
UNDER THIS TITLE.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(1) APPROVE CONTINUING EDUCATION COURSES REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ESTABLISH THE NUMBER OF HOURS OF CONTINUING EDUCATION
REQUIRED, AT LEAST HALF OF WHICH MUST INCLUDE SUPERVISED HANDS–ON
TECHNIQUES.
(C) AT THE TIME A LICENSEE APPLIES FOR LICENSE RENEWAL, THE
APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT TO THE BOARD, ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE BOARD, A
CERTIFICATION THAT THE APPLICANT HAS ATTENDED THE REQUIRED COURSES.
(D) THE BOARD MAY REFUSE TO RENEW THE LICENSE OF A LICENSED
MASSAGE THERAPIST WHO HAS:
(1) FAILED TO ATTEND THE REQUIRED COURSES; OR
(2) FAILED TO SUBMIT CERTIFICATION OF ATTENDANCE AT THE
REQUIRED COURSES.

HOUSE BILL 1012 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.